Louisiana, session 2026, HB780.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1201(F)(introductory paragraph) and (2) and 1201.1(A), (B), (D),
(E), (G) through (I), (J)(2) through (4), (K)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (2) through (5)
are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 23:1201(F)(6) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1201. Time and place of payment; failure to pay timely; failure to authorize;
penalties and attorney fees
* * *
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-490 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 780
F. Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, failure to provide payment
in accordance with this Section, discontinuance of payment due pursuant to this
Chapter, or failure to consent to the employee's request to select a treating physician
or change physicians when such consent is required by R.S. 23:1121 shall result in
the assessment of a penalty in an amount up to the greater of twelve percent of any
unpaid compensation or medical benefits, or fifty dollars per calendar day for each
day in which any and all compensation or medical benefits remain unpaid or such
consent is withheld, together with reasonable attorney fees for each disputed claim;
however, the fifty dollars per calendar day penalty shall not exceed a maximum of
two thousand dollars in the aggregate for any claim. A party claiming penalties and
attorney fees pursuant to this Section bears the burden of proof by a preponderance
of the evidence. The maximum amount of penalties which may be imposed at a
hearing on the merits regardless of the number of penalties which might be imposed
under this Section is eight thousand dollars. An award of penalties and attorney fees
at any hearing on the merits shall be res judicata as to any and all claims for which
penalties may be imposed under this Section which precedes the date of the hearing.
Penalties shall be assessed in the following manner:
* * *
(2)(a) This Subsection shall not apply applies only if the claim is reasonably
controverted or if such nonpayment, discontinuance of payment, or failure to consent
to the employee's request to select a treating physician or change physicians when
such consent is required by R.S. 23:1121 is found to be arbitrary, capricious, or
without probable cause.
(b) This Subsection does not apply if the nonpayment, discontinuance of
payment, or failure to consent to the employee's request to select a treating physician
or change physicians when such consent is required by R.S. 23:1121 results from
conditions over which the employer or insurer had no control.
* * *
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-490 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 780
(6) The provisions set forth in R.S. 23:1141 limiting the amount of attorney
fees do not apply to cases where the employer or insurer is found liable for attorney
fees pursuant to this Section.
* * *
§1201.1. Controversion of compensation and medical benefits
A. Upon the first payment of compensation or upon any modification,
suspension, termination, or controversion of compensation or medical benefits for
any reason, including but not limited to issues of medical causation, compensability
of the claim, or issues arising out of R.S. 23:1121, 1124, 1208, and 1226, the
employer or payor, or their authorized agent or attorney, who has been notified of the
claim, shall do all of the following:
(1) Prepare a "Notice of Payment, Modification, Suspension, Termination,
or Controversion of Compensation and/or or Medical Benefits" on a LWC-WC 1002
form or such other form as may be promulgated by the assistant secretary in
accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act.
(2) Send the notice of the initial indemnity payment required by Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection to the injured employee on the same day as no later than ten
business days after the first payment of compensation is made by the payor after the
payor has received notice of the claim from the employer.
(3) Send a copy of the notice of the initial payment of indemnity required by
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection to the office within ten days from the on the same
date the original notice was sent to the injured employee or by facsimile to the
injured employee's representative.
B. The form of the "Notice of Payment, Modification, Suspension,
Termination, or Controversion of Compensation and/or Medical Benefits" shall be
promulgated by the office. Upon any modification, suspension, termination, or
controversion of compensation or medical benefits for any reason, including but not
limited to issues of medical causation, compensability of the claim, or issues arising
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-490 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 780
out of R.S. 23:1121, 1124, 1208, or 1226, the employer or payor, or their authorized
agent or attorney, shall do all of the following:
(1) Prepare a "Notice of Payment, Modification, Suspension, Termination,
or Controversion of Compensation or Medical Benefits" on a LWC-WC 1002 form
or such other form as may be promulgated by the assistant secretary in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(2) Send the notice required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection to the
injured employee within three business days after the effective date of the
modification, suspension, termination, or controversion.
(3) Send a copy of the notice required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection
to the office on the same date the original notice was sent to the employee.
* * *
D.(1) Any notice required to be sent to the injured employee pursuant to this
Section shall be sent by certified mail or commercial carrier to the address at which
the employee is receiving payment of indemnity benefits, electronic mail to the
employee's electronic mail address on file with the employer or payor, or hand
delivery to the employee.
(2) For purposes of receiving notice as required by this Section, the
employee shall provide a mailing address and an electronic mail address upon
request from the employer or payor.
(3) If the injured employee is represented by an attorney, the notice shall also
be provided sent to the employee's representative attorney by facsimile, certified
mail, commercial carrier, electronic mail, or hand delivery. Proof that the notice was
sent to the employee's representative by facsimile as required in this Paragraph shall
be prima facie evidence of compliance with Subsection A of this Section.
E. The provisions of this Section shall do not apply to questions of medical
necessity as provided by R.S. 23:1203.1, or disputes concerning the amount of
reimbursement pursuant to R.S. 23:1034.2.
* * *
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-490 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 780
G.(1) If the employer or the payor provides the benefit that the employee
claims is due, including any arrearage, on the returned form or letter of amicable
demand within seven ten business days of receipt of the employee's demand, the
employer or payor shall not be subject to any claim for any penalties or attorney fees
arising from the disputed payment, modification, suspension, termination, or
controversion.
(2) If the employer or payor does not provide the benefit that the employee
claims is due, the employee may file a disputed claim for benefit provided it is filed
within the prescriptive period established under R.S. 23:1209. If the prescription
date of the claim occurs within the seven-day ten-day waiting period, the employee
will be allowed to file a disputed claim without waiting the seven ten business days
as provided in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. However, the employer or payor
shall still be allowed seven ten business days to provide the benefit that the employee
claims is due, and if the employer does provide the benefit, the disputed claim will
be moot regarding the issues arising out of the payment, suspension, modification,
termination, or controversion of benefits. All other issues alleged in the disputed
claim will be unaffected by the payment.
H. The employer or the payor who wishes to have a preliminary
determination hearing shall request the hearing in his answer to the disputed claim
arising from the notice of initial payment or any subsequent modification,
suspension, termination, or notice of controversion. In cases where a disputed claim
is already pending when an issue arises from a subsequent notice of payment,
modification, suspension, termination, or controversion of benefits, such request
shall be made in an amended pleading filed within fifteen ten business days of the
expiration of the seven-day ten-day period set forth in Paragraph (G)(1) of this
Section.
I.(1) An Preliminary determinations as provided for in this Section are
favored under the law and an employer or payor who has not complied with the
requirements set forth in Subsection A or B of this Section, and who has provided
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-490 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 780
notice as required in Subsection D, through E of this Section or has not initially
accepted the claim as compensable, subject to further investigation and subsequent
controversion shall not be entitled to a preliminary determination. An employer or
payor who is not entitled to a preliminary determination or who is so entitled but
fails to request a preliminary determination may be subject to penalties and attorney
fees pursuant to R.S. 23:1201 at a trial on the merits or hearing held pursuant to
Paragraph (K)(8) of this Section.
(2) If disputed by the parties, upon a rule to show cause held prior to the
preliminary determination or any hearing held pursuant to this Section, the workers'
compensation judge shall determine whether the employer is in compliance An
employee who objects to a request for a preliminary determination shall file a motion
to strike the request within ten business days of receiving the documentation required
to be produced by the employer or payor pursuant to Paragraph (J)(4) of this Section.
The motion shall state the factual and legal bases for the objection, and shall be
considered by the workers' compensation judge by a rule to show cause prior to any
preliminary determination hearing. Failure to file the motion to strike within the
prescribed time period shall be deemed a waiver of any objection to the preliminary
determination hearing.
J.
* * *
(2) The testimony of physicians may be introduced by certified records or
deposition. The parties may agree to allow uncertified medical records and
physician reports to be introduced into evidence. Witnesses may testify at the
hearing or, if agreed on by the parties, may offer testimony by introduction of a
deposition.
(3) The preliminary determination hearing shall be held no later than ninety
days from the scheduling conference. However, upon a showing of good cause, one
extension of an additional thirty days is permitted upon approval by the workers'
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-490 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 780
compensation judge. The workers' compensation judge shall issue a preliminary
determination no later than thirty fifteen days after the hearing.
(4) Any employer or payor requesting a preliminary determination hearing
shall produce all documentation relied on by the employer or payor in calculating,
modifying, suspending, terminating, or controverting the employee's benefits. These
documents shall be disclosed to the employee or the employee's representative within
ten business days of the request for the preliminary determination hearing.
K.(1) The employer or payor shall, within ten calendar business days of the
mailing of the preliminary determination from the workers' compensation judge, do
either of the following:
* * *
(2) Any employer or payor who accepts and complies with the workers'
compensation judge's determination within ten calendar business days, shall not be
subject to any penalty or attorney fees arising out of the original notice which was
the subject of the preliminary hearing.
(3) Any employer or payor who accepts and complies with the workers'
compensation judge's determination, but who disagrees with such preliminary
determination, shall notify the court within ten business days of receipt of the
preliminary determination of his desire to proceed to a trial on the merits of the
matters that were the subject of the preliminary hearing.
(4) Any employer or payor who does not accept the workers' compensation
judge's determination or fails to comply with the determination within ten calendar
business days, may, at the trial on the merits, be subject to penalties and attorney fees
pursuant to R.S. 23:1201, arising out of the issues raised in the original notice of
payment, modification, suspension, termination, or controversion of benefits, which
was the subject of the preliminary hearing.
(5) Any injured employee who disagrees with the preliminary determination
shall notify the court within ten business days of the receipt of such preliminary
determination of his desire to proceed to a trial on the merits of the matters that were
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-490 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 780
the subject of the preliminary hearing. If the employer or payor has accepted and
complied with the preliminary hearing determination, the employer or payor shall
also be entitled to litigate all issues including those issues presented at the
preliminary determination hearing.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 23:1201(I) and 1201.1(A)(4) and (5) are hereby repealed in their
entirety.